Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-567
Pension board; duties; retirement
plan reports.

(1) Beginning December 31, 1998, and each December
31 thereafter, the pension board of a city of the metropolitan class shall
file with the Public Employees Retirement Board an annual report on each retirement
plan established by such city pursuant to section 401(a) of the Internal Revenue
Code and shall submit copies of such report to the Auditor
of Public Accounts. The Auditor of Public Accounts may prepare a review of
such report pursuant to section 84-304.02 but is not required to do so. The
annual report shall be in a form prescribed by the Public Employees Retirement
Board and shall contain the following information for each such retirement
plan:

(a) The number of persons participating in the retirement plan;

(b) The contribution rates of participants in the plan;

(c) Plan assets and liabilities;

(d) The names and positions of persons administering the plan;

(e) The names and positions of persons investing plan assets;

(f) The form and nature of investments;

(g) For each defined contribution plan, a full description of investment
policies and options available to plan participants; and

(h) For each defined benefit plan, the levels of benefits of participants
in the plan, the number of members who are eligible for a benefit, and the
total present value of such members' benefits, as well as the funding sources
which will pay for such benefits.

If a plan contains no current active participants, the pension board
may file in place of such report a statement with the Public Employees Retirement
Board indicating the number of retirees still drawing benefits, and the sources
and amount of funding for such benefits.

(2) Beginning December 31, 1998, and every four years thereafter, if
such retirement plan is a defined benefit plan, the pension board of a city
of the metropolitan class shall cause to be prepared a quadrennial report
and shall file the same with the Public Employees Retirement Board and submit
to the Auditor of Public Accounts a copy of such report. The Auditor of Public Accounts may prepare
a review of such report pursuant to section 84-304.02 but is not required
to do so. The report shall consist of a full actuarial analysis
of each such retirement plan established by the city. The analysis shall be
prepared by an independent private organization or public entity employing
actuaries who are members in good standing of the American Academy of Actuaries,
and which organization or entity has demonstrated expertise to perform this
type of analysis and is unrelated to any organization offering investment
advice or which provides investment management services to the retirement
plan.

Laws 1998, LB 1191, § 5;

Laws 1999, LB 795, § 3;

Laws 2011, LB474, § 3.